Utah statutes.
26-6b-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Department" means the Department of Health or a local health department
as defined in Section 26A-1-102.
(2)  "First responder" means:
(a)  a law enforcement officer as defined in Section 53-13-103;
(b)  emergency medical service personnel as defined in Section 26-8a-102;
(c)  firefighters; and
(d)  public health personnel having jurisdiction over the location where an
individual subject to restriction is found.
(3)  "Order of restriction" means an order issued by a department or a
district court which requires an individual or group of individuals who are
subject to restriction to submit to an examination, treatment, isolation, or
quarantine.
(4)  "Public health official" means:
(a)  the executive director of the Department of Health, or the executive
director's authorized representative; or
(b)  the executive director of a local health department as defined in Section
26A-1-102, or the executive director's authorized representative.
(5)  "Subject to restriction" as applied to an individual, or a group of
individuals, means the individual or group of individuals is:
(a)  infected or suspected to be infected with a communicable disease that
poses a threat to the public health and who does not take action as required
by the department to prevent spread of the disease;
(b)  contaminated or suspected to be contaminated with an infectious agent
that poses a threat to the public health, and that could be spread to others
if remedial action is not taken;
(c)  in a condition or suspected condition which, if the individual is exposed
to others, poses a threat to public health, or is in a condition which if
treatment is not completed the individual will pose a threat to public health;
or
(d)  contaminated or suspected to be contaminated with a chemical or
biological agent that poses a threat to the public health and that could be
spread to others if remedial action is not taken.
